District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
76 act may be cited as the “Lead-Free DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2025”.
77 TITLE I. LEAD SERVICE LINE REPLACEMENTS.
78 Sec. 101. Definitions.
79 (a) “Adequate proof” means test-pitting or inspection of a service line:
80 (1) At a minimum of one location on the service line on public property and one
81 location on private property, each excavation covering at least two feet of the service line; and
82 (2) Undertaken by a licensed and certified plumber.
83 (b) “Child development facility” means a licensed community-based center, home, or
84 other structure, regardless of its name, that provides care, supervision, guidance, and other
2

85 services for infants, toddlers, and preschoolers on a regular basis. The term “child development
86 facility” does not include a child development center or program that is sponsored or run by a
87 public or private school.
88 (c) “Census block group” means geographic scale at which the Census Bureau reports
89 data from the American Community Survey, consisting of 600 to 3,000 individuals on average.
90 (d) “Community-based organization” means an organization operated by a nonprofit
91 entity or faith-based organization that provides services to residents of the District.
92 (e) “Historic brass service line” means those service lines that DC Water had identified as
93 brass based on existing service line data, plumbers’ records, home build dates, information on
94 known and likely locations of brass service lines, or combined with tap cards and other
95 engineering project data but have not been field-verified;
96 (f) “Historic copper service line” means those service lines that DC Water had identified
97 as copper based on existing service line data, plumbers’ records, home build dates, information
98 on known and likely locations of copper service lines, or combined with tap cards, and other
99 engineering project data but have not been field-verified;
100 (g) “Lead service line” means a water service line containing any lead, and shall include
101 a:
102 (1) Brass service line; or
103 (2) Galvanized service line.
104 (h) “Multi-unit residential property” means a residential building with 2 or more dwelling
105 units.
106 (i) “Public property” means all lands, properties, and holdings owned or leased by or
107 under the control of the District, and shall include properties under the control of the District of
108 Columbia Housing Authority.
3

109 (j) “Public space” means all the publicly owned property between the property lines on a
110 street, as such property lines are shown in the records of the District, and includes any roadway,
111 tree space, sidewalk, or parking between such property lines.
112 (k) “Private property” means all lands, properties, and holdings owned by private entities
113 in the District, and shall include federal properties on District land.
114 (l) “Private space” means the bounds of all privately owned property as demarcated by
115 the property lines on a street, as such property lines are shown in the records of the District.
116 (m) “Property line” means the line of demarcation between privately owned property
117 fronting or abutting a street and the publicly owned property in the line of such street.
118 (n) “Replacement of a lead service line” means:
119 (1) Replacement of all portions of a service line with a non-lead material where
120 the service line is a lead service line;
121 (2) Replacement and leveling of dirt and soil displaced during excavation and
122 replacement landscaping as required under this act;
123 (3) Replacement or restoration of interior and exterior walls and floors damaged
124 or demolished during replacement of a lead service line to a safe and habitable condition;
125 (4) Flushing household plumbing according to AWWA C810-17, or any standard
126 that revises or replaces this standard deemed to be equally or more protective, prior to returning
127 property to water service after the lead service line replacement; and
128 (5) Provision of filters in accordance with section 108 of this act.
129 (o) “Service line” means all portions of a water service line in both public and private
130 space, including the discharge of the corporation fitting to customer site piping, to the building
131 plumbing at the first shut-off valve inside the building, or 18 inches inside the building,
132 whichever is shorter, and including goosenecks and pigtails.
4

133 (p) “Service line of unknown composition” means a service line that:
134 (1) Is made of an unknown material, unidentified material, or materials
135 categorized as historic brass or historic copper;
136 (1) Has not been replaced by an approved contractor; and
137 (2) Has not had the service line composition assessed using testing pitting.
138 (q) “Test pitting” means excavation to expose a section of water service to determine the
139 location, size, and material type of existing water services.
140 Sec. 102. Lead service line mandates.
141 (a) The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority shall, by December 31, 2030:
142 (1) Replace all lead service lines in public and private space servicing private
143 properties;
144 (2) Be in receipt of written declaration from a licensed and approved contractor
145 that the property is not serviced by a lead service line; or
146 (3) Have a verified inventory record, including photographic evidence, for every
147 service line in the district documenting that no portion of the service line contains lead, brass, or
148 galvanized steel piping components.
149 (b) The Mayor shall replace all lead services line in public and private space on public
150 property, including property under the control of the District of Columbia Housing Authority, by
151 December 31, 2030.
152 (c) As of the effective date of this act, no public or private entity or person in the District
153 shall:
154 (1) Replace the portion of a service line that is in the public space at a property
155 unless it also replaces the portion of the lead service line that is in private space; or
5

156 (1) Replace the portion of a service line that is in private space at a property
157 unless it also replaces the portion of the lead service line that is in the public space; or
158 (d) No service line shall be installed in the District that contains lead, brass, or galvanized
159 steel piping components.
160 Sec. 103. Lead service line replacements at private properties.
161 (a) On or before October 1, 202, the owner of private property in the District (“property
162 owner”) shall:
163 (1) If the private property is serviced by a lead service line or service line of
164 unknown composition:
165 (A) Enroll in the Lead Service Line Replacement Program pursuant to
166 Section 104 of this act; or
167 (B) Replace the service line themselves in accordance with subsection (b)
168 of this section; or
169 (2) If the private property is not serviced by a lead service line, comply with
170 subsection (c) of this section.
171 (b)(1) Where the property owner elects to replace the lead service line themselves, the
172 property owner shall:
173 (A) Complete the replacement using an approved contractor within 1 year
174 of receipt of notice from DC Water provided pursuant to subsection (d) of this section;
175 (B) Pay all costs for the lead service line replacement; and
176 (C) Provide DC Water with proof that the lead service line has been
177 replaced.
178 (2)(A) Proof provided to DC Water pursuant to paragraph (1)(C) of this
179 subsection shall include at a minimum, in original or copy:
6

180 (i) The permit issued to a contractor approved by DC Water to
181 complete lead service line replacement work;
182 (ii) An invoice from the contractor who completed the work;
183 (iii) The estimate along with any report of the work completed; and
184 (iv) An inspection report, including photos that can be uploaded
185 into DC Water’s inventory database, verifying the replacement and the composition of the new
186 service line.
187 (B) DC Water shall post on its website information on how residents may
188 comply with this paragraph, including posting examples of each of the documents required under
189 subparagraph (A) and a means for uploading documents directly to the agency’s Geographic
190 Information System database or other similar database.
191 (4)(A)(i) DC Water shall publish on its website a list of approved contractors for
192 property owners to use for the replacement of a lead service line. The list shall be updated at
193 least once per fiscal year.
194 (ii) If a property owner seeks to use a contractor not on the list
195 required by subparagraph (A)(i) of this paragraph, the property owner shall first receive written
196 approval from DC Water to use that contractor.
197 (B) At least biannually, DC Water shall make available free trainings to
198 employees of approved contractors on proper execution of lead service line replacements, test
199 pitting, flushing, the risks posed by lead service lines and exposure to lead in water, especially to
200 fetuses and young children, the requirements of this act, and the Lead Service Line Replacement
201 Program.
202 (C)(i) A contract for a lead service line replacement where a property
203 owner elects to pay for the lead service line replacement themselves shall specify that:
7

204 (I) The composition of the service line will be assessed
205 using test pitting or inspection;
206 (II) The timeline for the replacement;
207 (III) Replacement of a lead service line means removal and
208 replacement of all portions of a service line in both public and private space, including the
209 discharge of the corporation fitting to customer site piping, to the building plumbing at the first
210 shut-off valve inside the building, or 18 inches inside the building, whichever is shorter, and
211 including goosenecks and pigtails; and
212 (IV) The contract will flush the household plumbing according to
213 AWWA C810-17, or any standard that revises or replaces this standard deemed to be
214 equally or more protective, prior to returning property to water service after the lead
215 service line replacement.(ii) DC Water shall post on the agency website a sample
216 contract.
217 (5) DC Water may grant an owner electing to replace the lead service line
218 themselves with extension of up to two years to complete the replacement where the property
219 owner demonstrates to DC Water that the property owner has made good faith effort to comply
220 with the act, and the replacement has been scheduled within the extension period.
221 (c)(1) Where a property is, according to DC Water’s database, not serviced by a lead
222 service line and:
223 (A) Where the lead service line was replaced pursuant to subsection (b) of
224 this section, the property owner shall provide written proof to DC Water that all sections of the
225 service line have been replaced by an approved contractor with materials not containing lead.
226 Proof under this subparagraph may include:
8

227 (i) Documentation, including photos, from a licensed and certified
228 plumber providing adequate proof that the property is not serviced by a lead service line; or
229 (ii) Evidence that the lead service line was previously replaced by
230 an approved contractor.
231 (B)(i) Where DC Water has proof verifying that the property is not
232 serviced by a lead service line, DC Water shall not require that the property owner provide
233 documentation that their property is not serviced by a lead service line.
234 (ii) For these properties, on or before October 1, 2023, DC Water
235 shall provide written confirmation to the property owner of which parts of the service line, if any,
236 the agency has determined are non-lead, and, where all portions of the service line are confirmed
237 non-lead, that the property owner is not required to submit additional proof to DC Water to
238 comply with this act.
239 (C) Where DC Water does not have proof verifying that the property is not
240 serviced by a lead service line, DC Water shall:
241 (i) Treat the property as served by a service line of unknown
242 composition until in receipt of proof; and
243 (ii) Request proof of the property owner.
244 (2) For the purposes of this subsection, “proof” means materials that provide
245 physical verification that the property is not serviced by a lead service line, and shall include
246 photos of the service line, contractor records and invoices, and as-built drawings, blueprints, or
247 other similar records for the property; provided that, DC Water may limit use of certain records
248 based on accuracy and reliability.
249 (d)(1) Where a service line is tested and found to contain any amount of lead, the
250 property shall be designated and treated by DC Water as a property serviced by a lead service
9

251 line, even where the property has previously undergone a lead service line replacement or other
252 lead mitigation. Where DC Water determines that the status of a property’s service line is to
253 change from non-lead to lead, DC Water shall provide written notice to the property within 10
254 days of learning that the service line contains lead.
255 (2)(A) DC Water shall accept the results of the following tests to determine
256 whether a non-lead service line contains lead: test pitting, scratch testing, magnet testing, surface
257 swabbing, tap sampling (flushed, sequential, or targeted), traditional or vacuum excavation, or
258 other methods as approved by the Department of Energy and Environmental or DC Water.
259 (e)(1) On or before October 1, 2023, DC Water shall provide notice to the property
260 owners of all properties with known lead services lines and service lines of unknown
261 composition of the requirement that the property owner enroll in the Lead Service Line
262 Replacement Program or replace the service line pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
263 Notice to owners under this subsection shall include:
264 (A) A statement that no level of lead exposure is safe, that all people
265 exposed to lead are at risk, the specific health risks to children from lead exposure, and that
266 replacement of lead service lines is the only way to fully prevent harm to persons from drinking
267 water delivered through lead service lines;
268 (B) A description of property owners’ options for complying with this
269 Act;
270 (C) A description of the lead service line replacement process and
271 anticipated timeline per the prioritization model developed pursuant to Section 105 of this act;
272 (D) Information on the importance of filtering drinking water provided to
273 the property by a lead service line, how the property owner or occupants at the property may
10

274 access filtration devices, potential sources of lead in household plumbing other than a service
275 line, and how the property owner or occupant at the property may safely use filtration devices;
276 (E) For properties serviced by service lines of unknown composition or
277 service lines without reliable documentation that they do not contain lead, information on how
278 their service line will be assessed, the limitations of at home testing methods, and the importance
279 of using filtration devices for at least six months after the service line is replaced to filter any
280 drinking water delivered through service lines at the property;
281 (F) Notice that a property owner may test their service line using the
282 methods described at subsection (d) and submit that test result to DC Water to confirm their
283 service line contains lead, and information on why such testing is insufficient to confirm that the
284 service line does not contain lead; and
285 (G) Website and contact information that property owners may use to
286 learn more about lead service line replacement and express concerns or questions.
287 (f)(1) DC Water shall determine that a lead service line is non-lead only using test pitting
288 and where the agency is in receipt of adequate proof. The results of other testing methods shall
289 not be dispositive on whether a property is serviced by a lead service line for the purposes of this
290 act.
291 (2) To assist private property owners who elect to replace a service line
292 themselves pursuant to section 103(b) of this act, DC Water shall post on the agency website
293 guidance for residents on what should be included in a contract for a lead service line
294 replacement, including:
295 (A)(i) A sample contract for a lead service line replacement;
296 (ii) A blank template contract for a lead service line replacement;
297 and
11

298 (iii) Information on what must be included in the terms of the
299 contract, including the elements listed at subsection (b)(4)(C).
300 (B) Fact sheets and other documentation outlining the health consequences
301 of lead exposure for children and adults.
302 Sec. 104. Lead Service Line Replacement Program.
303 (a)(1) On or before October 1, 2024, the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority
304 (“DC Water”) shall establish a Lead Service Line Replacement Program (“Program”), which
305 shall provide for the replacement of all portions of a lead service line servicing eligible private
306 properties at no cost to the property owner
307 (2) DC Water shall schedule replacements according to the prioritization method
308 described in section 105 and as otherwise required by this act.
309 (b)(1) DC Water shall deem a property eligible for the Program where the property owner
310 completes and submits to DC Water a right to entry form (“form”) consenting to provide
311 approved contractors and community-based organizations engaged pursuant to section 111 of
312 this act access to the property to undertake a service line replacement and remedial work
313 necessary to return the property to its original state.
314 (c)(1) The form shall be developed by DC Water in consultation with the Department of
315 Buildings, and shall:
316 (A) Be written at no more than a 5th grade reading level and be translated
317 into any non-English language spoken by a limited or no-English proficient population that
318 constitutes 3% or 500 individuals, whichever is less, in the District of Columbia; and
319 (B) Be made available online on the DC Water and Department of
320 Buildings website, accessible by both mobile phone and computer, and hard-copy format at at
321 least all District public library facilities, recreation centers, and police precincts.
12

322 (2) Prior to its finalization, DC Water shall test the form with at least one focus
323 group made up of District residents reflecting the demographic and cultural diversity of the
324 District.
325 (d) DC Water shall provide copies of submitted forms to the Rental Accommodation
326 Division in the Department of Housing and Community Development.
327 (e)(1) DC Water shall provide notice to property owners and all occupants at the property
328 of the date of the planned lead service line replacement at least 1 year, 1 month, and 3 days
329 before the scheduled date of the replacement.
330 (2) Where a lead service line replacement at a private property is scheduled by
331 DC Water for a date less than 1 year after the effective date of this act, DC Water shall provide
332 notice to the property owner of the date of the planned lead service line replacement within 1
333 month after the effective date of the act.
334 (3)(A) Notice under this subsection shall include phone calls, text messages,
335 emails, and door hangers, where DC Water has the information necessary to contact the property
336 owner and occupant via those means.
337 (B) For the purposes of compliance with this subsection, DC Water shall
338 utilize existing customer account data, including customer addresses, phone numbers, and email
339 addresses provided to DC Water for billing purposes, and shall furnish this data to community-
340 based organizations engaged under this Act to support outreach and engagement with residents.
341 (f) DC Water shall pay all costs to replace a lead service line, including all costs to
342 determine the composition of the service line, replace the lead service line, and any remedial
343 work necessary to return the property to its original condition or as close as possible to its
344 original condition.
13

345 (g)(1) DC Water shall contract with approved contractors to undertake lead service line
346 replacements under the Program.
347 (2)(A) DC Water shall submit to the Council a Standard Operating Procedure for
348 contracts for lead service line replacement services, which shall include clearly defined roles and
349 responsibilities for DC Water staff and contractors, and planned timelines and sequence of events
350 to implement all the provisions of this act, including public notice requirements, flushing
351 protocols, filter distribution, property and landscape restoration, and data collection and
352 reporting.
353 (B) The Standard Operating Procedure shall not be effective until
354 approved by the Council.
355 (3) DC Water shall include the following in any contract for lead service line
356 replacement services:
357 (A) Consent by the contractor to:
358 (i) Monthly coordination meetings with the DC Water program
359 manager or project staff and other contractors to identify opportunities and challenges for
360 improving the lead service line replacement process;
361 (ii) Real-time review by DC Water and a community-based
362 organization (“CBO”) pursuant to section 111 of this act of the contractor’s work under the
363 contract,
364 (iii) Payment of invoices only upon a finding by DC Water or the
365 CBO that all program elements are implemented as required under the Act and per contract
366 specifications;
14

367 (B) The approved Standard Operating Procedure developed pursuant to
368 paragraph (2), with language clearly denoting contractor responsibilities under the Standard
369 Operating Procedure, included as terms of the contract;
370 (C) Language clearly stating:
371 (I) That the composition of all service lines will be assessed
372 using test pitting and so as to establish adequate proof;
373 (II) The agency’s definition of lead service lines, which
374 shall conform with section 101(n) of this act; and
375 (III) A list of the work expected of the contractor to replace
376 the lead service line, which shall include and conform with all elements listed at section 101(o)
377 of this act; and
378 (D) A requirement that all service line data are properly entered in DC
379 Water’s database or otherwise submitted to DC Water per their explicit direction.
380 (E) Summaries of monthly coordination meetings with the DC Water
381 program manager or project staff and other contractors to identify opportunities and challenges
382 for improving the lead service line replacement process.
383 (4) DC Water shall revise all agency regulations, protocols, and policies to be
384 consistent with this act and the Standard Operating Procedure.
385
386 Sec. 105. Prioritization
387 (a)(1) On or before October 1, 2024, the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority
388 (“DC Water”) shall develop and publish on the agency website a priority schedule for lead
389 service line replacements at the census block group scale through the Lead Service Line
390 Replacement Program (“priority schedule”) in accordance with this section.
15

391 (2) DC Water shall score blocks for replacement under the priority schedule as
392 follows:
Parameter Description Weight
Consequences of Lead US Census American Community Survey Data 1.5
on the percentage of Black or African
American Households in the Census Block
Group
US Census American Community Survey Data 1.5
on the average median income in the Census
Block Group
The number of children 5 years and under in 2
the Census Block Group
Service Line Material Probability of lead, brass, or galvanized 5
service line at each property, averaged across
the Census Block Group
393 (3) For purposes of scoring the probability of lead in a service line material in the
394 priority schedule, DC Water shall assess the following scores:
395 (A) For lead and galvanized service lines, 10;
396 (B) For service lines of unknown composition, 5;
397 (C) For historic brass service lines, 4.7;
398 (D) For historic copper service lines, 2; and
399 (E) For other or non-lead service lines; 0.
400 (4) DC Water shall update the priority schedule at least annually.
401 (b)(1) On or before October 1, 2024, DC Water shall establish a high-priority lead service
402 line replacement program (“high-priority program”). DC Water shall replace all lead service
403 lines servicing these properties by October 1, 2025.
404 (2) Properties in the high-priority program shall include:
405 (A) Child development facilities (“facilities”);
406 (B) Multi-unit residential properties;
16

407 (C) Properties that previously underwent a partial lead service line
408 replacement; and
409 (D) Homes with emergency service line repairs or other urgent unplanned
410 work requiring replacement of any portion of a lead service line.
411 (3)(A) For facilities that come online after October 1, 2024:
412 (i) The Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall
413 provide written notice to DC Water that the facility is opening; and
414 (ii) DC Water shall replace lead service lines if present at these
415 properties within 1 year after receipt of the notice provided under this subparagraph.
416 (B) Written notice under subparagraph (A)(i) may also be submitted to DC
417 Water by the facility or the parent or guardian of an enrollee, where the facility or parent or
418 guardian provides DC Water with evidence of the child development facilities’ opening date and
419 a point of contact, including a phone number or email address, for the child development facility.
420 Sec. 106. Post-replacement flushing protocol.
421 Upon receipt of confirmation from a contractor of the completion of a lead service line
422 replacement, DC Water shall:
423 (1) As soon as possible, and before restoring water service after a lead service line
424 replacement:
425 (A) Flush the plumbing system at the property or provide the property
426 owner and current occupants with instructions on how to flush the plumbing system; and
427 (B) Provide, install, and/or maintain filtration device, providing a 6 month
428 supply of filter cartridges and education on how and why it is important to maintain the filter for
429 6 months following lead service line replacement.
17

430 (2) Maintain and replace filter cartridges provided to occupants pursuant to
431 section 108 of this act for at least six months following the lead service line replacement.
432 Sec. 107. Service line inventory.
433 DC Water shall maintain an inventory that identifies the material of all service lines
434 serving District properties. The inventory shall be made available to the public on the DC Water
435 website, and include, where in DC Water’s possession:
436 (1) For each property with a service line:
437 (A) The current material composing all portions of the service line, broken
438 down by composition of the service line in public space and private space;
439 (B) The date the service line was replaced or verified, if any; and
440 (D) Photos or other copies of written documentation provided to the
441 property owner or occupants confirming the service line material, where available; and
442 (2) Information on service line replacement practices, including for each property
443 that has had a lead service line replaced:
444 (A) The composition of the service line material removed;
445 (B) Date of the removal, if known;
446 (C) Data on whether the replacement was of the entire service line or only
447 the portion of the line in the public space or private space;
448 (D) Photos of the verified pipe material prior to replacement, where made
449 available to DC water;
450 (E) Photos of the completed service line replacement, where made
451 available to DC Water; and
18

452 (G) Photos or scanned documents of contractors’ certifications, with the
453 contractor’s signature, that flushing was completed in accordance with AWWA C810-17 and
454 that the occupant was provided a filter before restoring water service.
455 Sec. 108. Water filters.
456 (a) Within 14 days after providing notice to an owner of a residential property pursuant to
457 Section 103(e) of this act, the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (“DC Water”)
458 shall provide at no cost:
459 (1) Pitcher-style filters as follows:
460 (A) For single family properties, one pitcher and at least a 6 month supply
461 of filter cartridges; and
462 (B) For multi-unit residential properties, at least one filter unit per unit; or
463 (2) Point-of-use filters for all drinking water sources; and
464 (b)(1)(A) Filters provided pursuant to this section shall meet the current NSF/ANSI 42
465 standard for particulate Class I reduction and the NSF/ANSI 53 standard for lead reduction, or
466 any standard that revises or replaces this standard deemed to be equally or more effective at lead
467 reduction.
468 (B) The Department of Energy and Environment may issue regulations to
469 adopt different standards for filters from those established by this section, where the different
470 standard meets or exceeds the NSF/ANSI 42 standard for particulate Class I reduction and the
471 NSF/ANSI 53 standard for lead reduction.
472 (2) DC Water shall replace a broken filter, upon notice from the property owner
473 or occupant. DC Water may require a property owner to return the broken filter or provide other
474 evidence that the filter is broken to the agency.
19

475 (c)(1) DC Water shall provide a property owner or occupant eligible to receive filters
476 under subsection (a) of this section with filter cartridge replacements in a volume or frequency
477 such that the property owner or occupant can replace the filter cartridge in accordance with
478 manufacturer’s recommendations until the lead service line is replaced and for 6 months
479 afterwards; or
480 (2) DC Water shall prepare an automated customer alert system that reminds
481 residents about filter change schedules via their designated preferred communication method
482 with the agency.
483 (d) The Mayor shall make pitcher-style filters and filter cartridges available to all
484 enrollees in the Special Supplementation Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children
485 and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, regardless of whether the enrollee’s
486 residence is served by a lead service line.
487 Sec. 109. Real property sales and transfers.
488 (a) As a condition of sale or transfer of any real property in the District of Columbia
489 serviced by a lead service line or, the buyer shall, prior to closing:
490 (1)(A)(i) Enroll in the Lead Service Line Replacement Program; and
491 (ii) Complete and submit to DC Water a right to entry form
492 agreeing to allow authorized contractors access to the property to undertake the replacement and
493 any necessary remedial work; or
494 (B) Comply with section 103(b) and (c) of this act; and
495 (2) Request from DC Water and include with closing documents documentation
496 of the property being serviced by a non-lead service line or of DC Water’s schedule for lead
497 service line replacement at property.
20

498 (b) DC Water shall provide the documentation listed at subsection (a)(2) within 7 days of
499 receiving the request.
500 Sec. 110. Rental properties.
501 (a)(1)(A) A current occupant, including a tenant, may submit the right to entry form
502 (“form”) described at section 104(b) of this act on the property owner’s behalf; provided, that the
503 current occupant shall provide DC Water with proof that the individual currently resides at the
504 property.
505 (B) Where DC Water receives a form from an occupant, but DC Water has
506 knowledge that the property owner has complied with section 103 of this act, DC Water shall not
507 enroll the property in the Lead Service Line Replacement Program and shall provide notice to
508 the occupant that submitted the form of the property owner’s compliance with section 4(b) of
509 this act.
510 (2)(A) Where, pursuant to section 104 of this act, a property owner fails to submit
511 the right to entry form (“form”) to DC Water by January 1, 2025, or comply with section 103(b)
512 this act, DC Water shall attempt to contact current occupants at the property, including a tenant,
513 to request that an occupant submit the form by June 1, 2025.
514 (B) If, by June 1, 2025, DC Water has not received the form from the
515 property owner or occupant, nor has other knowledge of the property’s owner’s compliance with
516 section 103(b) of this act, DC Water shall engage a community-based organization to perform
517 outreach to the owner and occupant to address their concerns about replacement.
518 (3) Where the form is provided to DC Water by a current occupant, no liability
519 shall incur to the occupant, DC Water, DC Water’s contractors, or the District for the
520 replacement of the lead service line, where the replacement is completed by an approved
521 contractor.
21

522 (b) A landlord shall reimburse tenants for relocation expenses where a lead service line
523 replacement requires the tenant to leave the property overnight or for a longer period.
524 Reimbursement may be provided by the landlord by direct payment to the tenant or as a
525 reduction in the amount of the tenant’s rent owed.
526 (c) A landlord may not use costs associated with a lead service line replacement or the
527 benefits of having a non-lead service line as a basis for increasing rent for current tenants.
528 (d)(1) Where, on October 1, 2026, the owner of a multi-unit residential property has
529 failed to comply with Section 103(a) or (b) of this act, a tenant residing at that property or a
530 tenants’ rights organization may bring an action in the Superior Court to recover or obtain the
531 following:
532 (A) Equitable relief, including requiring the landlord to complete the lead
533 service line replacement by a date certain;
534 (B) Incidental and compensatory damages; and
535 (C) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
536 (e) For the purposes of this subsection:
537 (1) “Landlord” shall include the District of Columbia Housing Authority
538 (“DCHA”);
539 (2) “Relocation expenses” shall have the same meaning as at D.C. Official Code §
540 8-231.01(33); and
541 (3) “Tenant” shall include residents at a facility owned or under the control of
542 DCHA.
543 Sec. 114. Contractor work verifications.
544 (a) The District Department of Energy and Environment (“DOEE”) shall engage at least
545 one community-based organization (“CBO”) to review lead service line verifications and
22

546 replacements undertaken pursuant to this act for compliance with the act, the project contractor’s
547 contract with the District, DC Water, or property owner, and Districts laws and regulations.
548 (b) The CBO engaged by DOEE under subsection (a) of this section shall review at
549 random at least 5% of each approved contractor’s lead service line replacements in a given
550 month. The CBO shall directly observe the contractor’s work to verify service line material and,
551 where appropriate, replace the service line at these properties.
552 (c)(1) The CBO shall report results of its reviews to DOEE, DC Water, and the Council
553 monthly, and those reports shall include recommendations for additional contractor training,
554 where deemed necessary.
555 (2) Where the CBO provides 3 reports in a calendar year pursuant to paragraph
556 (1) that include findings of material errors in a particular contractor’s work, DC Water shall
557 terminate any contracts with that contractor and remove them from the approved contractor list.
558 Sec 112. Compliance.
559 (a)(1) The Mayor shall contract with community-based organizations (“CBO)”) to
560 provide public education on the risks posed by lead service lines and exposure to lead in water,
561 especially to fetuses and young children, the requirements of this act, the Lead Service Line
562 Replacement Program (“Program”), and access to and proper usage of lead filters.
563 (2) Where, as of April 1, 2024, a property owner has failed to comply with section
564 103(a) of this act:
565 (A) DC Water shall contact the property owner via email and telephone
566 about the Program, including the requirements under this act, the Program, including how to
567 enroll, access to and proper usage of lead filters, and the risks posed by lead service lines and
568 exposure to lead in water; and
23

569 (B)(i) DC Water shall provide the name and contact information of the
570 property owner to CBOs with a contract for public education pursuant to this subsection; and
571 (ii) CBOs shall directly engage those property owners about the
572 requirements on the Act, the Program, including how to enroll, access to and proper usage of
573 lead filters, and the risks posed by lead service lines and exposure to lead in water.
574 (b)(1) Where, as of October 1, 2025, a property owner has failed to comply with section
575 103(a) or (b) of this act, the Mayor shall fine the property owner at least $250 per month until the
576 property owner is in compliance.
577 (A) Where the property is a residential property with multiple units, this
578 fine shall be assessed against the property owner per unit.
579 (B) The Mayor may forgive fines under this paragraph where the property
580 owner provides evidence to the Mayor that the lead service line replacement at the property has
581 been scheduled.
582 (2) If, by October 1, 2026, a property owner assessed fines pursuant to this
583 subsection submits proof to the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority of the
584 replacement of the lead service line in accordance with section 103(c) of this act, the Mayor may
585 reduce or forgive the amount of fines assessed to that property owner.
586 (c) Where, as of October 1, 2026, a property owner has failed to comply with section
587 103(a) or 4(b) of this act, the Mayor shall deem the property owner ineligible to:
588 (1) For commercial properties, receive or renew a business license to operate a
589 business on the property;
590 (2) For residential properties, receive or renew a certificate of occupancy for any
591 structure on the property; and
24

592 (3) For all property types, obtain a permit to perform construction or
593 improvements on the property unless the permit is for replacement of the lead service line.
594 (d)(1) Where, as of October 1, 2027, a property owner has failed to comply with section
595 103(a) and (b) of this act, the Attorney General of the District of Columbia may initiate a civil
596 action against the property owner to compel the property’s owner’s compliance with the act.
597 (2) In a civil action initiated by the Attorney General for violations of this section,
598 the Attorney General may obtain equitable relief, civil penalties up to $5,000 per residential unit
599 at the property, and reasonable fees and costs.
600 Section 113. Public education.
601 (a)(1) By October 1, 2024, the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (“DC
602 Water”) and the Department of Energy and Environment (“DOEE”) shall, in consultation with
603 District community-based-organizations (“CBO”) that have a focus on mitigating lead in water,
604 environmental health, and child welfare, launch a public education and outreach campaign on the
605 risks posed by lead service lines and exposure to lead in drinking water, especially to fetuses and
606 young children, the requirements of this act, the Lead Service Line Replacement Program
607 (“Program”), access to and proper usage of lead filters, and the District’s lead registry.
608 (2) DC Water or DOEE shall present at at least one meeting of each Advisory
609 Neighborhood Commission as part of this public outreach campaign.
610 (3) In developing the public outreach campaign, DC Water and DOEE shall
611 prioritize outreach to the following:
612 (A) Pregnant women and women of child-bearing age;
613 (B) Seniors and senior centers; and
614 (C) Residential properties that have undergone a partial lead service line
615 replacement and are still served by a lead service line.
25

616 (b) The Mayor shall post in a conspicuous location at all District of Columbia Public
617 Library libraries, Department of Parks and Recreation recreational facilities, District of
618 Columbia Schools public schools, Metropolitan Police Department precincts, and Washington
619 Metropolitan Area Transit Authority stations signage on the requirements of this act and the
620 Program, including a method for residents to access the Program website and a telephone
621 number through which residents may learn about the Program.
622 (c) All communications to property owners and occupants under this act shall be
623 available in print format and web format accessible by both mobile phone and computer, and
624 written at no more than a 5th grade reading level and be translated into any non-English language
625 spoken by a limited or no-English proficient population that constitutes 3% or 500 individuals,
626 whichever is less, in the District of Columbia.
627 Sec. 114. Reporting.
628 (a) By October 1, 2024, DC Water and Mayor shall submit to the Council a report with
629 the following information:
630 (1) An updated budget and schedule through fiscal year 2030 for the replacement
631 of all lead service lines in the District, including estimated program costs for all District
632 agencies;
633 (2) A schedule and map or maps showing, in sequence, planned lead service line
634 replacements under the Lead Service Line Replacement Program established under section104,
635 by census block group, and under the high-priority program established at section 105(b) of this
636 act.
637 (3) The number of lead service lines remaining in the District and the total
638 number of private property owners who have received notices of unknown or lead service lines
639 on their property pursuant to this act, broken down by:
26

640 (A) Ward;
641 (B) Census tract;
642 (C) Advisory Neighborhood Commission;
643 (D) Commercial versus residential property; and
644 (E) For residential properties, whether the property is single occupancy or
645 multi-unit;
646 (4) The number of properties with a partial lead service line replacement, broken
647 down by:
648 (A) Ward;
649 (B) Census tract;
650 (C) Advisory Neighborhood Commission;
651 (D) Commercial versus residential property; and
652 (E) For residential properties, whether the property is single occupancy or
653 multi-unit;
654 (5) A list of contractors approved by DC Water to complete lead service line
655 replacements, and an estimate of the number of contractors needed to replace all lead service
656 lines by 2030.
657 (b) Beginning April 1, 2024, DC Water shall submit quarterly reports to District of
658 Columbia Auditor and Council Committee with jurisdiction over DC Water providing, for the
659 three-month period immediately preceding one month before the report’s due date, the
660 following:
661 (1) An account of DC Water expenses incurred during that period to implement
662 the Program and replace lead service lines, broken down by element in the budget submitted
663 pursuant to subsection (a)(1) of this section, including the program support budget;
27

664 (2) The monthly average cost per lead service line replacement; and
665 (3) The number of lead service lines replaced.
666 (c)(1) On December 1, 2024, and at least each year thereafter:
667 (A) The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (“DC Water”)
668 shall post on the agency website and submit to the Council the following data for the preceding
669 fiscal year:
670 (i) The number of lead service lines replaced to date, those in
671 progress, and the number still to be replaced, including break downs of:
672 (I) The number of child development facilities that have
673 had lead service lines replaced to date, confirmed to be non-lead, those in progress, and the
674 number still to be replaced; and
675 (II) The number of multi-unit residential properties that
676 have had lead service lines replaced to date, confirmed to be non-lead, those in progress, and the
677 number still to be replaced;
678 (ii) The number of service lines of unknown composition that have
679 been assessed since the effective date of this act, the number determined to be lead, confirmed
680 non-lead, and the number yet to be assessed;
681 (iii) The total number of property owners that provided proof of
682 lead remediation compliance under section 103(c) of this act or registered for the Program in
683 accordance with Section 103(a), broken down by:
684 (iv) The number of properties to which DC Water has provided
685 with lead filters and the number eligible for filters but not received them from DC Water;
686 (v) An updated budget, current identified funding levels, and
687 unmet funding needs; and
28

688 (vi) A summary of barriers to implementation of the Program and
689 recommendations for solving or removing these barriers;
690 (B) DC Health shall post on the agency website and submit to the Council
691 data on the number of lead filters that the agency has provided to residents pursuant to this act;
692 and
693 (C) CBOs engaged pursuant to this act may submit to the Council a
694 summary of barriers to implementation of the Program and recommendations for solving or
695 removing these barriers.
696 (2) For the data elements provided under paragraph (1)(A)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), and
697 (vi), DC Water shall provide the data broken down by:
698 (A) Ward;
699 (B) Census tract;
700 (C) Advisory Neighborhood Commission;
701 (D) Commercial versus residential property; and
702 (E) For residential properties, whether the property is single occupancy or
703 multi-unit.
704 (b) On January 1, 2029, the Attorney General shall post on the agency website and
705 submit to the Council data on the number of property owners against which the Attorney General
706 has brought a claim pursuant to Section 112(d) of this act, and the number of properties and
707 residential units implicated in those claims.
708 (c) By October 1, 2026, the District of Columbia Auditor shall transmit a report to the
709 Council on compliance with this act and the District’s efforts to replace lead service lines by
710 2030. To support this report, DC Water shall provide the Auditor with necessary data, including
711 the data informing the reports submitted to the Council pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
29

712 (d) DC Water shall retain historical data on the composition of service lines serving
713 private and public properties, in public and private space, and make that data available to the
714 public via the agency website.
715 Sec. 115. Funding.
716 Funds made available from the following sources shall not be used by the District of
717 Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (“DC Water”) to fund water main replacements unless DC
718 Water concludes that a lead service line replacement would cause the failure of the water main:
719 (1) Amounts deposited in the Lead Service Line Replacement Fund;
720 (2) Funds provided to DC Water by the District of Columbia to implement this
721 Act; or
722 (2) Federal funding awarded to DC Water to support lead service line
723 replacements.
724 Sec. 116. Regulations.
725 (e) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
726 Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue
727 rules to implement the provisions of this act.
728 TITLE II. LEAD SERVICE LINE PROGRAM AMENDMENTS
729 Sec. 201. The Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Act of 2004, effective December 7, 2004
730 (D.C. Law 15-2005; D.C. Official Code § 34-2151, et seq.), is amended as follows:
731 (1) Section 6012 (D.C. Official Code § 34-2151) to read as follows:
732 “(a) There is established within the General Fund of the District of Columbia a
733 nonlapsing Lead Service Line Priority Replacement Assistance Fund (“Fund”) to be
734 administered by the Mayor, in consultation with the District of Columbia Water and Sewer
735 Authority (“WASA”).
30

736 “(2) There shall be deposited in the Fund the following amounts:
737 “(A) General revenue funds appropriated by a line item in the budget
738 submitted pursuant to § 1-204.46 and authorized by Congress in an appropriations act for the
739 purposes of the Fund;
740 “(B) Grants from any source to the Fund or to the District of Columbia for
741 the purposes of the Fund;
742 “(C) Money allocated to or deposited in the fund by the Mayor, or funds
743 appropriated for the Fund, including capital funds;
744 “(D) Amounts collected as fines and penalties under the Lead Service Line
745 Replacement Omnibus Amendment Act of 2022 (“Act’); and
746 “(E) Interest earned from the deposit or investment of monies of the Fund.
747 “(3) The Fund shall be used to:
748 (A) Until October 1, 2024, to provide grants to eligible District
749 homeowners up to $2,500 to assist them in the replacement of the portion of their lead service
750 line that is located on their private property.
751 “(B) Implement the provisions of the act; and
752 “(C) To support lead service line replacements, including public
753 education, filters, and community engagement.
754 “(4) The Director is authorized to enter into intra-District transfers from the Fund
755 and other agreements with DC Water, District Department of Transportation, Department of
756 Buildings, and Department of Health, as necessary to implement provisions of the act.
757 “(5) Payments to eligible homeowners under paragraph (3)(A) are subject to
758 appropriation and the availability of funds. This section does not establish a right to funds on the
759 part of any person.
31

760 “(6)(A) The money deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the unassigned fund
761 balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any
762 other time, but shall be continually available for the purpose of the Fund, subject to authorization
763 by Congress.
764 “(B) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan,
765 any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year
766 limitation.”.
767 (2) Effective October 1, 2024, sections 6013, 6014, 6015, 6016, 6017, 6019a,
768 6019b, 6019c, 6019d, and 6019f (D.C. Official Code § 35-1215 through § 35-2156, § 35-2158
769 through § 35-2161, and § 35-2163) are repealed.
770 TITLE III. FISCAL IMPACT AND EFFECTIVE DATE
771 Sec. 301. Fiscal impact statement.
772 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
773 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
774 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
775 Sec. 302. Effective date.
776 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
777 Mayor, action by Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
778 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
779 24, 1973 (87 Sat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
780 Columbia Register.
32